Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.900

Short title—Statutory construction.

(1) This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the uniform TOD security registration act.

(2) This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policy and to make uniform the laws with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

(3) Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 287 s 11.]